New Jersey, session 221, A4073.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Police Training Commission in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall adopt a training course regarding school emergency response, including response to an active shooter threat.  The training course shall include lockdown drill observations.  The training shall be administered by the employing agency as part of the in-service training provided to each local police officer in each law enforcement unit operating in this State. b.    Prior to being appointed to permanent status as a local police officer in a law enforcement unit, an individual shall be required to complete the training course adopted under subsection a. of this section.  Every local police officer appointed prior to the effective date of this act shall, within 36 months of the effective date of this act, satisfactorily complete a training course in school emergency response. c.     The Police Training Commission shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.